Alaska statutes. Title 30. Navigation, Harbors, Shipping, and Transportation Facilities.
Chapter 07. Marine Radiotelephone Installation.

Sec. 30.07.010.
Radiotelephone installation requirements for vessels in excess of 200 gross tons.

In addition to applicable federal statutes and regulations, a person may not operate a vessel of any type in excess of 200 gross tons in the territorial waters of the state unless a licensed VHF radiotelephone installation equipped with at least five channels, including standard VHF calling and distress frequencies, or a standard marine radiotelephone equipped with at least five channels, including standard radiotelephone calling and distress frequencies, is installed and capable of being operated from the bridge or wheelhouse of the vessel. While the vessel is underway the radiotelephone shall be monitored at all times on the applicable standard calling and distress frequency by a person qualified to operate radio equipment of the type required by this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 80 SLA 1972)

Sec. 30.07.020.
Regulations.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities may adopt regulations, not in conflict with federal law or regulations, that establish standards for marine communications in the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 80 SLA 1972; am E.O. No. 39, § 5 (1977))

Sec. 30.07.030.
Penalties.

A master or owner of a vessel in operation that is in violation of this chapter, or a regulation adopted under it, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000.
Each day the violation continues constitutes a separate offense under this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 80 SLA 1972)